Utah, session 2026, HB573.
Section 1. Section 36-29-113 is enacted to read:36-29-113. Health Care Reform Task Force.(1)There is created the Health Care Reform Task Force, consisting of the following members:(a)three members of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate, no more than two of whom are from the same political party;(b)five members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, no more than three of whom are from the same political party;(c)the commissioner of the Insurance Department, or the commissioner's designee;(d)the state Medicaid director, or the director's designee; and(e)two members appointed by the governor.(2)A member of the Senate, designated by the president of the Senate, and a member of the House of Representatives, designated by the speaker of the House of Representatives, shall co-chair the committee.(3)The task force shall study the creation of one or more multistate coalitions to develop joint strategies and uniform compacts to address the health care systems including:(a)pharmacy benefit manager regulations;(b)drug purchasing;(c)health care costs reporting and transparency;(d)Medicaid; and(e)the health care work force.(4)The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide staff support to the task force.(5)A majority of members of the task force constitutes a quorum.(6)A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses as allowed in:(a)Section 63A-3-106;(b)Section 63A-3-107; and(c)rules made by the Division of Finance in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.(7)On or before September 1, 2027, the task force shall report the task force's progress and any recommendations to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.